tests/runtime/arithmeticexpr.sbl
// Test arithmetic expressions (AEs).
externals (stem)
routines (operators pseudovars)
integers (x y)

define stem as (
  operators
  pseudovars
)

define operators as (
  $x = 3 * 2
  $x *= 5
  $(x * 7 == 210) or fail='multiplication gave wrong answer'

  $x = 1 + 2
  $x += 4
  $(x + 8 == 15) or fail='addition gave wrong answer'

  $x = 1 - 2
  $x -= 4
  $(8 - x == 13) or fail='subtraction gave wrong answer'

  $(-x == 5) or fail='negation gave wrong answer'

  // Test division truncates towards zero.

  $x = 7
  $x /= 4
  $(x == 1) or fail='/= should truncate towards zero (+/+)'

  $y = 7
  $x = y / 4
  $(x == 1) or fail='/ should truncate towards zero (+/+)'

  $(7 / 4 * 4 == 4) or fail='should use integer / (+/+)'

  $x = -7
  $x /= -4
  $(x == 1) or fail='/= should truncate towards zero (-/-)'

  $y = -7
  $x = y / -4
  $(x == 1) or fail='/ should truncate towards zero (-/-)'

  $(-7 / -4 * 4 == 4) or fail='should use integer / (-/-)'

  $x = -7
  $x /= 4
  $(x == -1) or fail='/= should truncate towards zero (-/+)'

  $y = -7
  $x = y / 4
  $(x == -1) or fail='/ should truncate towards zero (-/+)'

  $(-7 / 4 * 4 == -4) or fail='should use integer / (-/+)'

  $x = 7
  $x /= -4
  $(x == -1) or fail='/= should truncate towards zero (+/-)'

  $y = 7
  $x = y / -4
  $(x == -1) or fail='/ should truncate towards zero (+/-)'

  $(7 / -4 * 4 == -4) or fail='should use integer / (+/-)'

  // Some target languages warn or even error for self-assignment.
  $x = x  $(x == -1) or fail='self assignment changed value'
  $x = cursor  tomark cursor  $(x == cursor) or fail='tomark cursor moved cursor'

  $(y > y) or $(y > 8) or $(maxint == minint)

  $y = 42

  $(y == 0)
)

define pseudovars as (
  $(cursor == 0) or fail='cursor should be 0'
  $(limit == 2) or fail='limit should be 2'
  test (next $(cursor == 1)) or fail='cursor should be 1'
  test (hop 2 $(cursor == 2)) or fail='cursor should be 2'
  setlimit next for $(limit == 1) or fail='limit should be 1'
  test (reverse $(cursor == 0)) or fail='cursor should be 0 (reverse)'
  test (reverse $(limit == 0)) or fail='limit should be 0 (reverse)'
  test (next reverse $(limit == 0)) or fail='limit should be 0 (reverse)'
  test (next reverse $(cursor == 1)) or fail='cursor should be 1 (reverse)'
  test (backwards $(cursor == 2)) or fail='cursor should be 2 (backwards)'
  test (backwards $(limit == 0)) or fail='limit should be 0 (backwards)'
  test (next backwards $(limit == 1)) or fail='limit should be 1 (backwards)'
)
